Hawaii statutes.
§185-2 Administrator and managers. The
administrator shall be responsible for coordinating the work of managers and
reviewing their plans for fire protection and control within the meaning of
this chapter. A manager shall be in charge of lands within forest reserves,
public hunting areas, wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and natural area reserves
for the manager's branch, and shall be in charge or in support of all measures
for the prevention, control, and execution of wildland fire protection in the manager's
branch. [L 1953, c 100, §4; RL 1955, §19-52; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L
1961, c 132, §1; HRS §185-2; am L 1974, c 64, pt of §1; am L 1994, c 140, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next